Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1405
Property; purchase; condemnation; procedure.

The dock board shall have power to purchase or acquire by any lawful means, such personal property and lands or rights or interests therein, including easements and leaseholds, as may be necessary for use in the provision and in the construction of any publicly owned harbor and terminal facilities and appurtenances as provided for in such plan as may be adopted by the board. If the board shall deem it proper and expedient that the county or municipality shall acquire possession or ownership of such property and lands or rights or interests therein, including easements and leaseholds, and no price can be agreed upon by the board and the owner or owners thereof, the board may cause legal proceedings to be taken to acquire same for the county or municipality by the exercise of the right of eminent domain hereby conferred. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724. The title of all lands, property, and rights acquired by the board shall vest in the county or the municipality.

Laws 1937, c. 37, § 3, p. 169;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-2003;

R.S.1943, § 18-704;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 64, p. 476;

Laws 1967, c. 84, § 3, p. 262;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-704.